District of Columbia statutes.
47-2838

Dealers in dangerous weapons.

(a)

Dealers in dangerous or deadly weapons shall pay a license tax of $300 per annum. No license shall issue hereunder without the approval of the Chief of Police, and the Council of the District of Columbia is authorized and empowered to make and promulgate regulations for the conduct of the business of persons licensed hereunder, including the power to require a record to be kept of all sales of deadly or dangerous weapons, to prescribe a form therefor, and to require reports of all such sales to the Chief of Police at such time as the Council may deem advisable.

(b)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued by the Metropolitan Police Department as a Public Safety endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 40
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 558, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(x), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(34), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(W), 50 DCR 6913

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2838.
1973 Ed., § 47-2340.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “Public Safety endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Safety endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(W) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).

Editor's Notes

Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: The Office of the Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police was abolished and all functions of that office transferred to and vested in the Chief of Police. The Assistant Superintendent, Executive Officer of the Metropolitan Police Department was designated “Deputy Chief of Police, Executive Officer”; the Assistant Superintendent of the Metropolitan Police in command of the Detective Bureau was designated “Deputy Chief of Police, Chief of Detectives”; and each other Assistant Superintendent of the Metropolitan Police was designated “Deputy Chief of Police” by Reorganization Order No. 7, dated September 16, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 7 was replaced by Organization Order No. 153, dated November 10, 1966.